Wyoming statutes. Title 12 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 6. Delivery

History.

2021 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 22, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2021.

§ 12-5-601.
Delivery of alcoholic liquors and malt beverages.

Retail liquor licensees, microbrewery permit holders, winery permit holders, winery satellite permit holders and manufacturer licensees with a satellite location may deliver or contract to have delivered alcoholic liquors and malt beverages to customers provided:

All sales of alcoholic liquors and malt beverages under this subsection shall take place in the licensed building. Orders of alcoholic liquors and malt beverages may be placed by phone, online or through a mobile application. All deliveries under this subsection shall be completed during the licensee’s remaining operating hours on the same day the alcoholic liquors or malt beverages are removed from the inventory of the licensed premise;

No order shall be received nor shall any delivery be made to or by a person under the age of twenty-one (21) years. All deliveries shall require the purchaser to provide to the deliverer a valid government issued identification demonstrating the purchaser is twenty-one (21) years of age or older;

All package sales and deliveries of alcoholic liquors and malt beverages for off-premises consumption shall be sealed. For purposes of this paragraph, “sealed” means a product enclosed:

In its original package and unopened;

In a plastic bag and heat sealed closed; or

In a container that has a breakable seal incorporated in the container cap.

Any contract delivery service shall adhere to the requirements of this subsection when delivering alcoholic liquors and malt beverages; and

Microbrewery permit holders, winery permit holders, winery satellite permit holders and manufacturer licensees with a satellite location shall only deliver or contract to have delivered their respective manufactured products.

History.

2021 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective date. —

Effective dates. —

Laws 2021, ch. 22, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2021.